Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB905.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The General Assembly shall set the salaries of the justices and judges of the
Court of Justice in the judicial branch budget bill.
(b) 1. The Chief Justice shall include in the judicial branch budget
recommendation the salaries of[ the justices and] the judges of the
District Court and Circuit Court.
2. If the General Assembly concurs with the recommended judicial salaries
contained in the judicial branch budget recommendation, then the[
judicial] salaries of the judges of the District Court and Circuit Court
and shall be set in the judicial branch budget bill by incorporating by
reference the judicial branch budget recommendation.
3. If the General Assembly sets judicial salaries different from the judicial
branch budget recommendation, then the General Assembly shall set
forth the salaries of the[ justices and] judges of the District Court and
Circuit Court, or the incremental changes in the judicial branch budget
bill.
(2) The General Assembly shall set the salaries of the Justices of the Supreme Court
and the Judges of the Court of Appeals.
(3) The Chief Justice shall include in the judicial branch budget recommendation:
(a) The filing fees and costs, and any changes in the fees and costs, set under
KRS 23A.200 or 24A.170 during the fiscal biennium immediately preceding
the biennium for which the recommendation is submitted; and
(b) A statement of whether, and to what extent, the Supreme Court intends to
raise or anticipates raising the fees and costs set under KRS 23A.200 or
24A.170 during the biennium for which the recommendation is submitted.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:04 PM Jacketed